Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.130

Disclosure of other digital assets held in trust when trustee not original user.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose, to a trustee that is not an original user of an account, a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an original or successor user and stored, carried, or maintained by the custodian in an account of the trust and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications in which the trust has a right or interest, if the trustee gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of the trust under RCW 11.98.075;

(3) A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(a) A number, user name, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust's account; or

(b) Evidence linking the account to the trust.

[ 2016 c 140 s 13.]